District of Columbia statutes.
7-839

Appropriation.

There is hereby authorized to be appropriated out of the general revenues of the District of Columbia government sufficient funds to carry out the requirements of this subchapter.

Apr. 29, 1980, D.C. Law 3-65, § 10, 27 DCR 1087
July 25, 1985, D.C. Law 6-13, § 2(e), 32 DCR 3235
1981 Ed., § 6-319.